Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
672B]

DESIGN
CLAIM CONCILIATION PANEL

Section

672B-1 Definitions

672B-2 Administration of chapter

672B-3 Design claim conciliation panels;
composition,

selection, compensation

672B-4 Waiver of filing fee

672B-5 Review by panel required; notice;
presentation

of claims; request for a more definite
statement

of the claim

672B-6 Certificate of consultation

672B-7 Design claim conciliation panel hearing;

fact-finding; evidence; voluntary
settlement

672B-8 Design claim conciliation panel hearing;
persons

attending

672B-9 Design claim conciliation panel hearing;
decisions

672B-10 Expungement of records; liability
insurance rates

672B-11 Subsequent litigation; excluded evidence

672B-12 Arbitration; subsequent litigation

672B-13 Submission of claim to an alternative
dispute

resolution provider

672B-14 Immunity of panel members from liability

672B-15 Statute of limitations tolled

672B-16 Duty to cooperate; assessment of costs
and fees

672B-17 Annual report

Revision Note

Throughout this chapter, "design claim conciliation
panel" substituted for "design claims conciliation panel"
pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Design professional liability; highways, see §663-10.98.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next